District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.33m

Grant authorization.

The Mayor may make a grant to the Development Sponsor in an amount not to exceed $2.5 million to assist in paying costs for architectural, engineering, design and consulting, and financial and legal services, and the costs related to the preparation of feasibility studies, plans, surveys, historic structure reports, reports of project revenues and expenses, and other predevelopment costs of the project.

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-278, § 14, 55 DCR 11050